District of Columbia statutes.
7-103

Sanitary Inspectors — Appointment; qualifications; subordinates.

There may be appointed by the Mayor of the District of Columbia, on the recommendation of the Director of the Department of Human Services, a reasonable number of Sanitary Inspectors for said District, to hold such appointment at any 1 time, of whom 2 may be physicians, and 1 shall be a person skilled in the matters of drainage and ventilation; and said Mayor may remove any of the subordinates, and from time to time may prescribe the duties of each.

June 11, 1878, 20 Stat. 107, ch. 180, § 9
Aug. 1, 1950, 64 Stat. 393, ch. 513, § 1
Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-191, § 6(a), 53 DCR 6794
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.
Office of Director of Public Health abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 7-101.
D.C. Law 16-191 validated a previously made technical correction.
1973 Ed., § 6-104.
1981 Ed., § 6-103.